src-fst-morphology-affixes-noun_affixes.lexc.md
[OLD: NOUN_PREFIXES]

[OLD: PREFIXES]

[OLD: PREFIXES]
[OLD: PV_COUNTER1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: BOUND1]

[OLD: BOUND1]
[OLD: PV_COUNTER1]

[OLD: PV_COUNTER1]
[OLD: PREFIXES]
[OLD: PREFIXES]
[OLD: PREFIXES]
[OLD: PREFIXES]

[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
New list of preverbs
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: BOUND]

[OLD: BOUND]
[OLD: PV_COUNTER]

[OLD: PV_COUNTER]

[OLD: VAI_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: VAI_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: VII_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: VII_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: POSS_NUM]

[OLD: POSS_NUM]

[OLD: POSS_NUM]
[OLD: POSS_NUM]
[OLD: POSS_NUM]
[OLD: POSS_NUM]

[OLD: POSS_NUM]
[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NA_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: NI_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: NA_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: NI_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES]

[OLD: INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]
[OLD: ENCLITICS]

[OLD: ANIM_INTERR]

[OLD: ENCLITICS]

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-bla/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc)</small>

---
